Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.437

Purple heart license plates.

"Purple heart license plates" means special license plates that may be assigned to a motor vehicle required to display one or two license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department, to recipients of the Purple Heart medal or to another qualified person.

[ 2011 c 332 s 2; 2010 c 161 s 133.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.